Hawaii statutes.
[§286-213] Improper representation as
official inspection station. Any person who in any manner represents that
the business operated at any location is an official inspection station without
a permit issued by the director under section 286-211, or any person other than
a person operating an inspection station under a permit granted by the director
who issues a certificate of inspection shall be fined not more than $1,000 or
imprisoned not more than one year, or both. [L Sp 1977 1st, c 20, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next